District of Columbia statutes.
31-5708

Repealed

Reincorporation or continuance of powers of existing corporations.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1313, ch. 854, § 756
Apr. 29, 1998, D.C. Law 12-86, § 1237(a), 45 DCR 1172
1973 Ed., § 35-908.
1981 Ed., § 35-1208.